Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-793
Bureau; power to quarantine; rules and regulations.

(1) The bureau shall have the authority to place in quarantine at the expense of the owner any animal which has been brought into this state in violation of the Animal Importation Act. Any quarantine so imposed shall remain in effect until released by the bureau.

(2) The Department of Agriculture may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to aid in the administration and enforcement of the act.

Laws 1975, LB 321, § 13;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 11.